Hawaii statutes.
[§137-2] Reimbursement. (a) Whenever
any government entity engages in a search or rescue operation for the purpose
of searching for or rescuing a person, and incurs search and rescue expenses
therein, the government entity may seek reimbursement from the following:

(1) The person on whose behalf search or rescue
operations were conducted, including the person's estate, guardians,
custodians, or other entity responsible for the person's safety;

(2) A person who ultimately benefited from a search
or rescue operation by being rescued; or

(3) Any entity responsible for placing the person in
the position of danger for which the search or rescue operation was initiated.

(b) Reimbursement under subsection (a) shall
be allowed only if the need for search or rescue was caused by any act or
omission by the person searched for or rescued, constituting intentional
disregard for the person's safety, including, but not limited to, intentionally
disregarding a warning or notice. [L 1999, c 66, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next